Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4700.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2025, chapter 35, article 2, section 4, is amended to read: Sec. 4. PEACE OFFICER STANDARDS AND TRAINING (POST) BOARD $ 11,691,000 $ deleted text begin 11,739,000 deleted text end new text begin 14,832,000 new text end (a) Peace Officer Training Reimbursements $2,949,000 deleted text begin eachdeleted text end new text begin the first year and $6,042,000 the secondnew text end year deleted text begin isdeleted text end new text begin arenew text end for reimbursements to local governments for peace officer training costs. (b) Philando Castile Memorial Training Fund $4,942,000 each year is to support and strengthen law enforcement training and implement best practices. This funding shall be named the "Philando Castile Memorial Training Fund." These funds may only be used to reimburse costs related to training courses that qualify for reimbursement under Minnesota Statutes, sections 626.8452 (use of force), 626.8469 (training in crisis response, conflict management, and cultural diversity), and 626.8474 (autism training). Each sponsor of a training course is required to include the following in the sponsor's application for approval submitted to the board: course goals and objectives; a course outline including at a minimum a timeline and teaching hours for all courses; instructor qualifications; and a plan for learning assessments of the course and documenting the assessments to the board during review. Upon completion of each course, instructors must submit student evaluations of the instructor's teaching to the sponsor. The board shall keep records of the applications of all approved and denied courses. All continuing education courses shall be reviewed after the first year. The board must set a timetable for recurring review after the first year. For each review, the sponsor must submit its learning assessments to the board to show that the course is teaching the learning outcomes that were approved by the board. A list of licensees who successfully complete the course shall be maintained by the sponsor and transmitted to the board following the presentation of the course and the completed student evaluations of the instructors. Evaluations are available to chief law enforcement officers. The board shall establish a data retention schedule for the information collected in this section. Each year, if funds are available after reimbursing all eligible requests for courses approved by the board under deleted text begin this subdivisiondeleted text end new text begin paragraph (b)new text end , the board may use the funds to reimburse law enforcement agencies for other board-approved law enforcement training courses. The base for this activity is deleted text begin $878,000deleted text end new text begin $3,878,000new text end beginning in fiscal year 2028 and thereafter.